New Mexico, session 2026, HB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO: SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION.--One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) is appropriated from the general fund to the veterans' services department for expenditure in fiscal years 2026 and 2027 to contract for services to ensure safe, humane and consistent care for service and companion animals, including animal boarding and veterinary care; establish kennels at facilities primarily housing veterans; and provide pet food for service or companion animals that assist or benefit veterans' well-being to reduce barriers to shelter access, housing stability and supportive services. Any unexpended balance remaining at the end of fiscal year 2027 shall revert to the general fund. - 2 -